Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.235

Retirement allowance deductions for health care benefit plans.

Participants in a health care benefit plan approved pursuant to RCW 41.04.180, 41.05.065, or 28A.400.350, whichever is applicable, who are retired public employees, may authorize the deduction from their retirement allowances, of the amount or amounts of their subscription payments, premiums, or contributions to any person, firm, or corporation furnishing or providing medical, surgical, and hospital care or other health care insurance upon the approval by the retirement board of an application for such deduction on the prescribed form, and the treasurer of the state shall duly and timely draw and issue proper warrants directly to and in favor of the person, firm, or corporation, or organization named in the authorization for the amount authorized to be deducted.

[ 1993 c 386 s 4; 1983 c 3 s 89; 1975 1st ex.s. c 73 s 1.]

NOTES:

Intent—1993 c 386: See note following RCW 28A.400.391.

Effective date—1993 c 386 ss 1, 2, 4-6, 8-10, and 12-16: See note following RCW 28A.400.391.